Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the State Department  of Energy, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Energy development services .... $ 8,635,678
(2) Nuclear safety and emergency
response.................................... $ 82,333
(3) Small Scale Local Energy
Project Administration
and Bond Sinking Fund............. $ 1,500,000
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$75,998,614 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Department
of Energy.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,439,160 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the State Department of  Energy for debt service for the energy
efficiency and  sustainable technology loan program, and for the public schools grant pro-
gram.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$4,191,188 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the State Department of
Energy.
SECTION 5. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, the following  expenditures by the
State Department of Energy are not limited:
(1) Expenditures for loans for small scale local energy projects; and
(2) Expenditures for debt service.
Enrolled House Bill 5016 (HB 5016-A) Page 1
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House May 17, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5016 (HB 5016-A) Page 2